Tennessee, session 114, HB0790.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-50-354(a), is amended by adding
the language ", including an honorably discharged member of the national guard" immediately
after the language "to an honorably discharged veteran".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-50-354(b), is amended by adding
the following as a new, appropriately designated subdivision:
( ) The applicant's honorable discharge certificate, department of defense form
256 (DD 256), or report of separation and record of service, NGB form 22, that indicates
an honorable discharge characterization;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0790
002019
- 1 -